Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.300

Enrollment options information to parents.

Each school district board of directors annually shall inform parents of the district's intradistrict and interdistrict enrollment options and parental involvement opportunities. Information on intradistrict enrollment options and interdistrict acceptance policies shall be provided to nonresidents on request. Providing online access to the information satisfies the requirements of this section unless a parent or guardian specifically requests information to be provided in written form.

[ 2009 c 556 s 7; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 208.]

NOTES:

Captions, headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28A.225.225.

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.